Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-139
Scope of rate regulation.

Except as provided in the Nebraska Telecommunications Regulation Act, telecommunications companies shall not be subject to rate regulation by the commission and shall not be subject to provisions as to rates and charges prescribed in sections 75-101 to 75-158.

Laws 1986, LB 835, § 3;

Laws 1991, LB 286, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 618, § 4;

Laws 1997, LB 660, § 7;

Laws 2000, LB 1285, § 15;

R.S.Supp.,2000, § 86-803;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 38.